test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kanarik43_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kanarik: # Noun (43) kanarik 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kanarik+N+Sg+Nom: kanarik
     kanarik+N+Sg+Gen: kanarigu
     kanarik+N+Sg+Par: kanarikku
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ill: kanarikku
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ine: [kanarigun, kanariguh, kanariguhn]
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ela: kanarigust
     kanarik+N+Sg+All: kanarigulõ
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ade: kanarigul
     kanarik+N+Sg+Abl: kanarigult
     kanarik+N+Sg+Tra: kanarigus
     kanarik+N+Sg+Ter: kanariguniq
     kanarik+N+Sg+Abe: kanariguldaq
     kanarik+N+Sg+Com: kanarigugaq
     kanarik+N+Pl+Nom: kanariguq
     kanarik+N+Pl+Gen: [kanarikkõ, kanarikka]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Par: [kanarikkõ, kanarikka]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ill: [kanarikkõhe, kanarikkõ, kanarikkõdõ, kanarikkahe, kanarikka, kanarikkadõ]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ine: [kanarigõn, kanarigõh, kanarigõhn, kanarigan, kanarigah, kanarigahn]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ela: [kanarigõst, kanarigast]
     kanarik+N+Pl+All: [kanarigõlõ, kanarigalõ]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ade: [kanarigõl, kanarigal]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Abl: [kanarigõlt, kanarigalt]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Tra: [kanarigõs, kanarigas]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Ter: [kanarigõniq, kanariganiq]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Abe: [kanarigõldaq, kanarigaldaq]
     kanarik+N+Pl+Com: [kanarigõgaq, kanarigagaq]
